Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 7 Retirement Allowances, Disability Benefits, Spouses’ Benefits
47-2-123.
Allowance payable upon death, disability, or involuntary separation from employment; restrictions on separation for disability; restrictions on entitlement to involuntary separation benefits.

Upon the death or involuntary separation from employment without prejudice of any member in service, he or she shall be entitled to an allowance in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section, provided that the provisions of this subsection that relate to “upon becoming involuntarily separated from employment without prejudice” shall not be applicable to any person who first becomes a member after March 31, 1972.

Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) through (5) of this subsection, any member in service who has at least 15 years of creditable service may be retired on a disability allowance by the board of trustees, upon written application to the board of trustees by the member or his or her employer and upon certification by the medical board that he or she is medically or physically incapable of further performance of his or her duties in the position he or she held at the time his or her disability originated, that incapacity is likely to be permanent, and that he or she should be retired; provided, however, that the medical board shall not consider any evidence of such disability which is not submitted within 12 months after the date the member submits his or her first application for a disability retirement. The board of trustees may retire such member not less than 30 days nor more than 90 days after execution and filing of the written application.

A member making application for a disability retirement pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall at the same time submit a copy of such application together with any supporting documentation accompanying such application to his or her employing agency. The member shall thereafter provide the employing agency with any additional information or documentation which he or she submits to the board of trustees in conjunction with such application.

After receipt of the notice provided for in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the head of the member’s agency or his or her designee shall conduct an interview with the member applying for disability retirement; provided, however, that any designee of the head of an agency shall be an official at such agency who is above the level of the applicant’s immediate supervisor and who has the authority to make job assignment decisions. The interview shall be held within ten business days after receipt of such notice. Based on the interview and information received by the agency pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the agency head or his or her designee shall determine if an alternative position is available for the member which meets the following requirements:

The physical requirements for such position are compatible with the member’s physical limitations;

The annual compensation and possibility for future advancement for such position shall be the same as or greater than that of the current position of the member;

The duties for such position shall be reasonably compatible with the experience and educational qualifications of the member;

The position shall be one which includes the holder thereof as a member of the retirement system provided for by this chapter; and

The position must be available for acceptance by the member and an offer of the position to the official or member must be made, in writing, by not later than 45 days after the member submitted his or her application for a disability retirement.

An agency making an offer of alternative employment as provided in this paragraph shall so notify the board of trustees within 45 days after the member submitted his or her application for a disability retirement. After receipt of such notice, the board of trustees shall not approve a disability retirement until the procedures of paragraph (4) of this subsection are resolved.

Any member applying for a disability retirement who is offered a position of employment in conformity with the requirements of paragraph (3) of this subsection shall accept the offer or dispute his or her ability to perform the tasks required by the position offered by submitting a written appeal to the agency and to the board of trustees within 30 days after receiving the offer. In the event of an appeal, the agency shall promptly submit to the medical board a detailed description of the requirements of the position offered and the medical board shall determine, based upon all information available to it, whether the member is reasonably capable of performing such tasks. The decision of the medical board shall be final. If the medical board determines that the member is unable to perform the tasks required either by the position held at the time of the application for a disability retirement or the position offered, the member shall be placed on disability retirement immediately.

A member who refuses to accept a position offered or file an appeal in a timely manner or who refuses to accept a position which the medical board has determined on appeal that he or she is capable of performing shall not be eligible to receive a disability retirement under this subsection.

The provisions of this paragraph shall apply only to persons who are members of the retirement system on June 30, 2007. Any member who is at least 60 years of age upon disability retirement, involuntary separation from employment without prejudice, or death shall receive the equivalent of a service retirement allowance. Any such member who is under 60 years of age shall receive, as appropriate, a disability allowance, allowance in case of involuntary separation from employment without prejudice, or death allowance, which shall consist of:

In the case of a member with at least 15 years of service, 75 percent of the service retirement allowance which would have been payable upon service retirement at age 60 had the member continued in service to age 60 without further change in compensation, provided that this subparagraph shall not apply to a member whose employment was terminated by involuntary separation without prejudice;

In the case of a member with at least 20 years of service, the service retirement allowance which would have been payable upon service retirement at age 60 had the member continued in service to age 60 without further change in compensation;

In the case of a member with at least 25 years of service, 75 percent of the service retirement allowance which would have been payable upon service retirement at age 65 had he or she continued in service without further change in compensation; or

In the case of a member with at least 30 years of service, the service retirement allowance which would have been payable upon service retirement at age 65 had he or she continued in service without further change in compensation.

Any provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, in the application of subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of this paragraph relating to allowances other than for disability or death, projected retirement allowance computations shall be made on the basis of the member’s highest total monthly earnable compensation, as reflected by monthly contributions made during the last 24 calendar months in which he or she had made contributions, except that no salary increase by adjustment in compensation in any manner in excess of 10 percent during the last 12 months of membership service shall be included in the projected computation.

The provisions of this paragraph shall apply only to persons who first or again become members of the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007. Any member who has at least 15 years of creditable service and who becomes disabled before becoming eligible for a service retirement as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 47-2-110 shall be eligible to retire forthwith without regard to age and to receive a disability retirement allowance calculated upon the number of years of creditable service attained to the date of retirement and based upon his or her highest average monthly compensation during a period of 24 consecutive calendar months while a member of the retirement system. No member who is eligible for an equivalent service retirement shall be eligible to apply for a disability retirement allowance.

In lieu of a death benefit as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, a member who first or again becomes a member of the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007, and who has at least ten years of creditable service and is at least 60 years of age or who is less than 60 years of age and has at least 15 years of creditable service shall upon death receive the equivalent of a service retirement allowance calculated upon the number of years of creditable service attained on the date of death and based upon his or her highest average monthly compensation during a period of 24 consecutive calendar months while a member of the retirement system.

In the application of subsection (c) of this Code section to death allowances, computations of projected retirement allowances shall be made on the same basis as though option two had been in effect. In lieu of the amount of death allowance otherwise payable to the beneficiary under option two, the member, upon written request, may at any time elect a reduced level death allowance of equivalent actuarial value, which allowance is payable to the beneficiary during a period of years certain or to the estate of the beneficiary and during the lifetime of such named beneficiary thereafter. At the election of the member, in case of death of the beneficiary during a term of years certain, the balance of the years certain payments may be paid to the estate of the member; but if such beneficiary predeceases the member, the total amount of the member’s contributions to the date of his or her death shall be payable to the member’s estate. The method of determining the equivalent actuarial value shall be consistent with the actuarial method of determining the beneficiary’s death allowance under option two.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, on and after March 6, 1963, a member who has not accumulated sufficient creditable service to qualify himself or herself for an allowance in case of involuntary separation from employment without prejudice shall not be deemed eligible for such allowances until he or she has accumulated sufficient membership service in a position classified under a merit system provided for by law or in a position covered under the retirement system. This subsection shall not affect the vesting of rights under Code Section 47-2-122. This subsection shall not be retroactive in any manner and shall not apply in any way to any person who was a member on or before February 13, 1962.

The age and service requirements for a service retirement allowance shall not apply to allowances available under this Code section.

From and after January 1, 1985, no employing unit within the government of the State of Georgia, including every department, commission, board, bureau, agency, branch of government, or any other employing unit by whatever name called, which has the authority and power to appoint, employ, release, separate, or fail to reappoint public officials or employees shall release or separate from state service, or fail to reappoint to continued state service, any public official or employee who is entitled to coverage under the involuntary separation retirement benefits provisions of this Code section. A release, separation, or failure to reappoint in violation of the provisions of this subsection shall be illegal, unlawful, and void. However, such releases or separations from state service or failures to reappoint to continued state service shall not be subject to the provisions of this subsection if such releases or separations from service or failures to reappoint occur under any of the following circumstances:

Separation or release from service of an official or employee pursuant to Code Section 47-2-2 or separation or release from service of an official or the failure to reappoint an official by a board when such official serves at the pleasure of the board;

Separation or release from service of an official or employee for any reason which would constitute cause as defined in the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board if such separation or release from service is not pursuant to Code Section 47-2-2;

Separation or release from service of an official or employee for criminal conduct under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States; or

A “discretionary termination” which means any one of the following:

Separation or release from service of an official or employee under circumstances in which an official or employee is released or separated or any official’s or employee’s position or job is abolished through a valid reduction-in-force plan approved by the Department of Administrative Services;

Separation or release from service of any official or employee by reason of a bona fide reorganization of any employing unit, with respect to which reorganization any such separations or releases have been approved in advance by the Governor; or

Separation or release from service of an official or employee, or failure of reappointment of an official or employee, who holds a confidential position to an appointed or elected public official, or a group of appointed or elected public officials, incurred as a result of a change of administration in the office of such appointed or elected public official, or group of appointed or elected public officials.

An explanation of the reasons for the proposed discretionary termination of the official or employee.

Except where termination is required by a sudden and unexpected loss of federal or state funds, an employer intending the discretionary termination of an official or employee shall notify the commissioner of administrative services at least 60 but not more than 120 days prior to the effective date of the discretionary termination of such official or employee. If termination is required by a sudden and unexpected loss of federal or state funds, the employer shall notify the commissioner of administrative services as soon as the employer becomes aware of the loss of funds and the termination shall be delayed until the completion of the procedures required by this subsection. Pending the completion of such procedures, the employee or official proposed for termination because of a sudden and unexpected loss of federal or state funds shall be compensated from any funds appropriated or available to the employer which may be used for such purpose. The notice shall be in writing and a copy thereof shall be forwarded to the board of trustees at the same time it is forwarded to the commissioner of administrative services. The notice shall include the following information:

After receipt of the notice provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the commissioner of administrative services shall schedule an interview with the official or employee proposed for discretionary termination. The interview shall be held within 15 days after receipt of the notice. Based on the interview with the official or employee proposed for discretionary termination and the information provided by the notice received by the commissioner pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the commissioner shall contact appropriate state departments, boards, bureaus, and other agencies of the state government for the purpose of seeking continued employment for the official or employee proposed for discretionary termination. Any position for continued employment of the official or employee proposed for discretionary termination which is obtained by the commissioner shall meet the following requirements:

The annual compensation for such position shall be the same or greater than the current annual compensation of the official or employee proposed for discretionary termination;

The duties for such position shall be reasonably compatible with the previous work experience and educational qualifications of the official or employee proposed for discretionary termination;

The position shall be one which includes the holder thereof as a member of the retirement system provided for by this chapter; and

The position must be available for acceptance by the official or employee proposed for discretionary termination at least one day prior to the effective date of such termination and an offer of the position to the official or employee must be made, in writing, by not later than the day immediately preceding the effective date of the discretionary termination.

Any official or employee proposed for discretionary termination who is offered a position of continued employment in conformity with the requirements of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be deemed to have resigned from service at his or her own choice upon the failure of such official or employee to accept the position of continued employment, and no such official or employee so resigning from service shall qualify for retirement benefits based upon involuntary separation from employment without prejudice as authorized by this Code section.

If the commissioner of administrative services fails to obtain a position of continued employment in conformity with the requirements of paragraph (2) of this subsection for an official or employee proposed for discretionary termination, then, on the effective date of the discretionary termination, the official or employee may be considered involuntarily separated from employment without prejudice for the purposes of this Code section.

The commissioner of administrative services shall notify the board of trustees in writing of the action taken by the commissioner pursuant to this subsection and of any position of continued employment which is offered to and accepted or refused by an official or employee proposed for discretionary termination.

It is the intention of this subsection to provide procedures to secure the continued employment of officials and employees who may become subject to discretionary termination, and the provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to create any right to continue in a position of employment when that right does not exist independently of this subsection.

(A)

The name and current annual compensation of the official or employee proposed for discretionary termination;

(B)

The age, length of service, current job description, and summary of the work experience of the official or employee proposed for discretionary termination;

(C)

The educational qualifications of the official or employee proposed for discretionary termination; and

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 5; Ga. L. 1951, p. 394, § 6; Ga. L. 1952, p. 175, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 349, § 5; Ga. L. 1957, p. 283, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1959, p. 107, § 4; Ga. L. 1962, p. 54, § 5; Ga. L. 1962, p. 152, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 42, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1361, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 26, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 685, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 360, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1296, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 333, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 223, § 1/HB 379; Ga. L. 2007, p. 73, § 1/SB 162; Ga. L. 2009, p. 322, § 2/HB 476; Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1/SB 98; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436; Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 7/HB 805.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, added paragraph (c)(3). The second 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, substituted “State Personnel Administration” for “State Merit System of Personnel Administration” in subparagraph (g)(4)(A).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “ten years” for “10 years” near the middle of paragraph (c)(3).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “commissioner of administrative services” for “commissioner of personnel administration” throughout this Code section; inserted “or she” in subsection (a) and in the first sentence of subsection (e); inserted “or her” in the third sentence of subsection (d); inserted “or herself” in the first sentence of subsection (e); substituted “Department of Administrative Services” for “State Personnel Administration” in subparagraph (g)(4)(A); and deleted “of personnel administration” following “commissioner” in the third and fourth sentences of paragraph (h)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1296, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that this Act would become effective on January 1, 1985, only if a proposed amendment (see Ga. L. 1984, p. 1726) to the Constitution (Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. X, Para. VI) authorizing the General Assembly to revise provisions of public retirement or pension systems relating to involuntary separation from employment were ratified at the 1984 general election. Such approval was given at that election.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1296, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “Pursuant to the authority of the proposed constitutional amendment described in Section 5 of this Act and being contingent for its effectiveness on January 1, 1985, upon the ratification of such proposed constitutional amendment, this Act is exempt from the provisions of Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated known as the ‘Public Retirement Systems Standards Law.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 107, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 1/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The purpose of this Act is to make conforming amendments and correct references in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to retirement and pensions, relative to the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services as provided by a separate Act.”
The separate Act referred to is Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, which became effective July 1, 2012, and which provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 13/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, only if an Act abolishing the State Personnel Administration and providing for the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services is enacted and becomes effective on that same date; otherwise, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2012.”
Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, effective July 1, 2012, provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of recent developments, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 473 (1986).

47-2-123.1.
[Repealed] Procedures to secure continued employment of employees subject to discretionary termination.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1296, § 4, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1296, § 4, repealed this Code section. However, § 5 of that Act provided that the repeal would become effective on January 1, 1985, only if a proposed amendment (see Ga. L. 1984, p. 1726) to the Constitution (Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. X, Para. VI) authorizing the General Assembly to revise provisions of public retirement or pension systems relating to involuntary separation from employment were ratified at the 1984 general election. Such approval was given at that election.

This Code section was enacted at the same legislative session as the Act which provided for its repeal. See Ga. L. 1984, p. 1309, § 1 for the enacting provisions.

47-2-124.
Eligibility for benefits of persons with at least 95 percent of required service credit.

Any member who is serving in the year which represents 95 percent of the required time for vesting of benefits under Code Section 47-2-111 or 47-2-122 or of the required time for benefits under subsections (c) through (e) of Code Section 47-2-123 shall be deemed to qualify for the required number of years.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 160, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 297, § 1.

47-2-125.
Reexamination of persons receiving disability benefits; effect of refusal to undergo examination; effect of ability to engage in gainful employment.

Once each year during the first five years following the retirement of a member on a disability retirement allowance and once in every three-year period thereafter, the board of trustees may require a disability beneficiary who has not yet attained retirement age as specified in subsection (a) of Code Section 47-2-110 to undergo a medical examination by a physician or physicians designated by the medical board. The disability beneficiary may request such an examination. Should any disability beneficiary who has not yet attained retirement age refuse to submit to such medical examination, the pension of such disability beneficiary may be discontinued by the board of trustees until the withdrawal of such refusal; and should the refusal continue for one year, all rights of the disability beneficiary in and to a pension may be revoked by the board of trustees.

Should the medical board report and certify to the board of trustees that a disability beneficiary is engaged in or is able to engage in a gainful occupation paying more than the difference between the disability beneficiary’s retirement allowance and the earnable compensation used to calculate the disability retirement allowance at the time of retirement, the board of trustees may reduce the disability beneficiary’s pension to an amount which, together with the disability beneficiary’s annuity and the amount earnable by the disability beneficiary, equals the earnable compensation used to calculate the disability retirement allowance at the time of retirement. Should the disability beneficiary’s earning capacity be later changed, the amount of the pension may be further modified, provided that the modified pension shall not exceed an amount which, together with the disability beneficiary’s annuity and the amount earnable by the disability beneficiary, equals the earnable compensation used to calculate the disability retirement allowance at the time of retirement.

The provisions of this paragraph shall apply to persons who first or again become members of this retirement system on or after September 1, 2010. For purposes of paragraph (2) of this subsection, the amount earnable by the beneficiary shall include any income payment received from workers’ compensation; provided, however, that in the event of a lump sum payment, the monthly disability allowance shall be reduced on an actuarial basis as determined by the actuary of this retirement system.

The board of trustees may require a disability beneficiary who has not yet attained retirement age as specified in subsection (a) of Code Section 47-2-110 to provide information relevant to any provision of this chapter relating to his or her entitlement to receive a disability retirement. Should any disability beneficiary who has not yet attained retirement age refuse to submit any such information so requested, the board of trustees may suspend the retirement allowance of such disability beneficiary until such information is provided. Should the board of trustees receive information from any source that a disability beneficiary is engaged in an occupation paying more than the difference between the disability beneficiary’s retirement allowance and the earnable compensation used to calculate the disability retirement allowance at the time of retirement, the board of trustees may reduce the disability beneficiary’s pension to an amount which, together with the disability beneficiary’s annuity and the amount earnable by the disability beneficiary, equals the earnable compensation used to calculate the disability retirement allowance at the time of retirement. Should the disability beneficiary’s earnings later be changed, the amount of the pension may be further modified, provided that the modified pension shall not exceed an amount which, together with the disability beneficiary’s annuity and the amount earnable by the disability beneficiary, equals the earnable compensation used to calculate the disability retirement allowance at the time of retirement.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 5; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1108, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 555, § 1/HB 459; Ga. L. 2010, p. 414, § 1/HB 172.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 24, 2010, in subsection (a), designated the existing provisions as paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2); substituted “by a physician or” for “, such examination to be made at the disability beneficiary’s place of residence or other place mutually agreed upon, by” near the end of the first sentence of paragraph (a)(1); and added paragraph (a)(3).

47-2-126.
Restoration to service of disability beneficiary.

If a disability beneficiary is restored to service, the retirement allowance of the beneficiary shall cease and the beneficiary shall again become a contributing member of the retirement system.
Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any prior service certificate or creditable service which was used to compute such a member’s creditable service at the time of retirement shall be restored to full force and effect, and upon the member’s subsequent retirement the member shall be credited with all service as a member.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 5; Ga. L. 1951, p. 394, § 7; Ga. L. 1990, p. 525, § 1.

47-2-127.
Applicable ages for computation of benefits; duration of benefits.

In the application of Code Sections 47-2-121, 47-2-123, 47-2-124, and subsection (d) of Code Section 47-2-120 to allowances, the monthly benefit of the member, whether dead or in life, or his beneficiary shall be computed as if the member attained age 60 or 65, whichever is applicable, and upon reaching that age applied for a retirement allowance. The monthly benefit so computed shall be payable for the life of the member or pursuant to the terms of the option, if any, selected by the member under Code Section 47-2-121.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 283, § 10.

47-2-128.
Survivors benefit coverage; fund; contributions.

Wherever the term “survivors benefits” is used or referred to in this chapter, it shall be construed to be group term life insurance.

Pursuant to the provisions of this Code section, Code Section 47-2-129, and rules or regulations adopted for such purpose, the board of trustees may provide for survivors benefits for members, former members, and retired members of the retirement system.

Notwithstanding Article 3 of this chapter, there shall be established an additional fund, to be known as the “survivors benefit fund,” which shall be administered in the following manner:

There shall be accumulated in the survivors benefit fund the contributions deducted from the earnable compensation of members covered for survivors benefits, together with payments made to the fund by employers, including interest earned on deposits and investments of such funds;

There shall also be accumulated in the survivors benefit fund the payments required of retired members and vested former members covered for survivors benefits as provided in subsections (g) and (h) of this Code section, together with interest earned on such payments; and

All assets of the survivors benefit fund and all income, interest, and dividends derived from deposits and investments shall be used for the payments of benefits and expenses necessary for the maintaining of survivors benefit coverage. Such benefits and expenses shall in no manner become an obligation of the pension accumulation fund.

Contributions for survivors benefits shall be provided for and administered in the following manner:

After notice from the board of trustees, each employer shall cause to be deducted from the earnable compensation of each member during every payroll period the additional amount established by the board of trustees, but not to exceed one-half of 1 percent of the member’s earnable compensation. Such deductions shall be made under the same conditions as set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-2-51 and, except for those members who are not eligible for survivors benefits, that amount shall be the member’s payment for such coverage;

Any member who is not eligible for survivors benefits shall have the additional contributions provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection credited to the member’s annuity savings account to be used to purchase an additional annuity at retirement under the conditions set forth in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-2-51; and

There is authorized an employer payment to the fund which shall be a percentage of the earnable compensation of the members of the retirement system. The board of trustees shall establish the rate of such payment, but in no case shall such rate, when added to the members’ contributions, exceed 1 percent. Funds for employer payment shall be requested in the same manner as provided in Code Section 47-2-57.

The board of trustees may adopt or rescind any rules or regulations which are not in conflict with this Code section and which it deems necessary in establishing and maintaining the plan of operation, including benefit tables and other provisions of coverage. Such rules and regulations shall include the following:

A member’s payment for coverage shall vest in the member no rights other than for the period for which the member has paid the required additional contributions into the survivors benefit fund;

A notice by the board of trustees to members through their employers that the additional contributions provided for in this Code section will in the future be credited to the individual member’s annuity savings account under conditions set forth in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-2-51 shall suspend any and all survivors benefit coverage then in effect, provided that such action shall be applicable to all members alike and without prejudice to any survivors benefits pending in the case of a then deceased member; and

Subsequent to any notice released under paragraph (2) of this subsection, any additional notice made in the same manner and within 12 months of the original notice to the effect that coverage is again available shall reestablish survivors benefits to those formerly covered and to all new members who are otherwise eligible, except that within 30 days from the date of such notice any member may decline benefits under this Code section.

The board of trustees may determine the date on which the plan for survivors benefit coverage shall be placed into operation, provided that such date shall not be prior to July 1, 1953. The board of trustees shall notify all employers who, in turn, shall notify the members that additional contributions will commence on the determined date.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (i) of this Code section, in the event a member retires, the retired member shall continue paying the amount provided for under this Code section which the member was paying at the time of retirement; and the benefits provided for under this Code section shall remain fixed at the same amount as they would have been had the member died on the day immediately preceding the date of retirement. The board of trustees is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to cover this subsection.

Any other provisions of this chapter or any rules or regulations to the contrary notwithstanding, any member who withdraws from service before attaining age 60 but whose right to a service retirement allowance has vested under Code Section 47-2-122 may continue paying the amount under this Code section which the member was paying at the time of withdrawing from service, together with the amount of the employer contribution in effect at the time of such withdrawal, in which case the benefits under this Code section shall remain fixed at the same amount as they would have been had the member died on the day immediately preceding the member’s withdrawal. Only those members with at least 18 years of creditable service at the time of withdrawal from service shall be eligible under this subsection. The board of trustees is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to cover this subsection.

As applied to those members whose first membership in the retirement system is on or after April 1, 1964, the survivors benefits program may provide for a reduction of benefits after the attainment of a certain age and for a different or no contribution after retirement based on such reduction in benefits.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 323, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 158, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1964, p. 119, § 3; Ga. L. 1967, p. 751, §§ 5-7; Ga. L. 1976, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 670, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1259, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1263, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments regarding Georgia’s insurance laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 117 (1979).

47-2-129.
Group term life insurance protection as part of survivors benefits program.

The board of trustees may provide group term life insurance protection for the members of the retirement system as the survivors benefits program provided for in Code Section 47-2-128 by contracting for such service with the State Employees’ Assurance Department or any insurance company licensed to operate in Georgia, which company has experience in the underwriting of groups similar in size and type of coverage.
Such contract must provide benefits to those persons entitled to benefits under Code Section 47-2-128.
All or any part of funds and other assets previously accumulated for the purposes of Code Section 47-2-128 may be used by the board of trustees in the execution of this contract. Contributions for such coverage shall be provided for and collected as set forth in subsection (d) of Code Section 47-2-128.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 520, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 751, § 8; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1263, § 2.